Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Division 1. Wyoming Retirement Act

Editor's notes. —

Section

9-3-401

through

9-3-432

have been designated as the Wyoming Retirement Act at the direction of the legislative service office following the enactment of Uniform Management of Public Employee Retirement Systems (MPERS) Act, §§

9-3-433

through

9-3-452

, by Laws 2005, ch. 119, § 1.

§ 9-3-401.
Short title.

This article is known and may be cited as “The Wyoming Retirement Act”.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 114, § 32; W.S. 1957, § 9-294; W.S. 1977, §§

9-5-201

,

9-3-401

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 202, § 1.

Quoted

in

Broadhead v. Broadhead, 737 P.2d 731,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 442

(Wyo. 1987).

§ 9-3-402.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Account” or “member account” means:

For a member who has a minimum of four (4) years of service or a member initially employed before July 1, 2018, the member’s contributions, the member’s contributions paid by an employer under W.S.

9-3-412

and any amounts transferred to the system from a terminated system on behalf of the member, plus interest compounded annually at a rate determined by the board not to exceed the average annual investment yield earned on the assets of the system, subject to subparagraph (C) of this paragraph;

For a member who has fewer than four (4) years of service and who is initially employed on or after July 1, 2018, only the member contributions paid by a reduction in cash salary of the member together with the interest on those contributions, subject to subparagraph (C) of this paragraph;

Commencing July 1, 2019 for a member who has fewer than four (4) years of service, no interest shall accrue to the member account during any period in which the member is not employed by a participating employer.

Repealed by Laws 1994, ch. 67, § 3.

“Actuarial equivalent amount” means a benefit of equal value computed upon the basis of the actuarial assumptions determined by the board;

“Board” or “retirement board” means the retirement board of the Wyoming retirement system established by this article;

“Disability” means the mental or physical incapacitation of any member including:

“Total disability” which is a disability condition that renders a member unable to engage in any occupation for which he is reasonably suited by training or experience and which is reasonably expected to last at least twelve (12) months; and

“Partial disability” which is a disability condition that renders a member unable to perform the occupation for which he is reasonably suited by training and experience but still allows him to function in other employment and which is reasonably expected to last at least twelve (12) months.

“Employer” or “participating employer” means:

The state of Wyoming and any department, board, commission or other agency or instrumentality of the state;

Any county, county memorial hospital, special hospital district, city or town or legally constituted department designated to the board by the appropriate governing body as an employer under this article;

Any municipal corporation;

Any school district;

The Wyoming School Activities Association;

The Wyoming Education Association;

The Wyoming School Boards’ Association;

The Wyoming Public Employees’ Association;

and (K) Repealed by Laws 1994, ch. 67, § 3.

(M)

The Wyoming County Commissioners’ Association;

(N)

The Wyoming Association of Municipalities;

(O)

Any senior citizen center within the state;

(P)

Community-based mental health, substance abuse, developmental disabilities, family violence and sexual assault programs which receive state support and which operate under standards established by the division of community programs [department of health] pursuant to W.S.

9-2-102

, those programs and facilities serving youth certified by the department of family services pursuant to W.S.

9-2-2101

and those programs and facilities serving individuals in need of vocational rehabilitation as certified by the division of vocational rehabilitation pursuant to W.S.

9-2-109

;

(Q)

The legislative service office;

(R)

The state judicial branch;

(S)

Any community college;

(T)

The University of Wyoming;

(U)

Any special district; and

(W)

Any other political subdivision of the state or local government or any organization or entity which by virtue of its organization or purpose is considered by the board to be a governmental entity and receives a major portion of its funding from taxing authority delegated by law, from federal, state or local government or from an agency or political subdivision of state or local government.

“Member” means and includes any full-time or regular part-time employee of an employer, including substitute teachers if treated by the employer as regular, part-time employees and including law enforcement officers and firefighter members, but “member” does not mean:

An employee who is compensated:

As an independent contractor; or

On a fee basis.

An employee who is reimbursed on a per diem basis;

An employee whose term of employment is on a temporary basis for less than six (6) months;

Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 10, § 2.

Members of any state board or commission not otherwise employed by the state who elect in writing not to become a member of the system under rules adopted by the board;

Employees covered by other retirement plans of the state or a political subdivision of the state, including:

The supreme court and district court justices’ pension plan, and employees covered under the judicial retirement act under W.S.

9-3-701

through

9-3-713

;

Police pension plans;

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 45, § 2.

The paid firemen pension plans;

The Wyoming state highway patrol, game and fish warden and criminal investigator retirement program.

Members of the legislature;

Students employed by the University of Wyoming, community colleges or school districts;

Employees of the agricultural extension service of the University of Wyoming who hold a federal civil service appointment and are required to participate in the federal civil service retirement program;

An employee of the University of Wyoming or a community college who earns no more than five thousand five hundred dollars ($5,500.00) per year for part-time teaching and has elected in writing not to participate in the system under rules adopted by the board;

An at-will contract employee under W.S. 9-2-3207(a)(xi)(F), unless specifically authorized by the contract pursuant to W.S. 9-2-3207(a)(xi)(F)(III) or (IV);

An elected member of a county, municipal or school district commission, council or board, if:

The commission, council or board on which the elected member serves participates in the system;

The elected member is otherwise employed by an entity participating in the system; and

The elected member elects in writing at the beginning of the member’s service on the commission, council or board not to become a member of the system, for purposes of his service as an elected official, under rules adopted by the board. An election pursuant to this subdivision is irrevocable during the remainder of the member’s service on the commission, council or board.

Repealed by Laws 1994, ch. 67, § 3.

“Prior creditable service” means service credit earned by a member prior to April 1, 1953 in one (1) of the terminated systems and for which necessary employer and employee contributions were transferred to the retirement system;

“Employee” means an employee of a participating employer as defined by this article;

through (H) Repealed by Laws 1994, ch. 67, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 1994, ch. 67, § 3.

“Interest” means interest compounded annually at the rate or rates determined by the board, not exceeding the average amount of interest actually earned per annum by the account;

“Retire”, “retired” or “retirement” means the termination of a member’s working career for a salary as an employee and the fulfillment of the requirements for eligibility to receive either a retirement or a disability benefit under this article;

“Retirement benefit” or “benefit” means a sum of money paid monthly in accordance with this article to a member who has retired;

“Retirement system” means the Wyoming retirement system created by this article;

“Salary” means the cash remuneration paid to a member in a calendar year, including employee contributions required by W.S.

9-3-412

and including member contributions paid by the employer under a salary reduction arrangement under W.S. 9-3-412(c). “Salary” taken into account for a member shall not exceed the amount specified under section 401(a)(17) of the United States Internal Revenue Code;

“Terminated system” or repeal acts in the case of a teacher means the Wyoming teacher retirement system provided by Chapter 159, Session Laws of Wyoming, 1951, and in the case of a state employee means the state employees’ retirement association provided by Chapter 42, Session Laws of Wyoming, 1949, as amended by Chapter 140, Session Laws of Wyoming, 1951;

“Law enforcement officer” or “officer” means any member who is a county sheriff, deputy county sheriff, municipal police officer, duly authorized investigator of the Wyoming livestock board meeting the specifications of W.S. 7-2-101(a)(iv)(E), duly authorized personnel of the Wyoming gaming commission meeting the specifications of W.S. 7-2-101(a)(iv)(P), investigator employed by the Wyoming state board of outfitters and professional guides meeting the specifications of W.S. 7-2-101(a)(iv)(J), Wyoming correctional officer, probation and parole agent employed by the Wyoming department of corrections, Wyoming law enforcement academy instructor, University of Wyoming campus police officer, community college police officer, detention officer or dispatcher for law enforcement agencies;

“Highest average salary” means:

For members not subject to subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, the average annual salary of a member for the highest paid three (3) continuous years of service;

For a general member initially employed after August 31, 2012 the average annual salary of the member for the highest paid five (5) continuous years of service.

“General member” means a member who is not a law enforcement officer or a firefighter member;

“Service credit” means the credit earned by a member for eligibility for benefits and benefits payable under the system. Service credit is earned on the basis of actual years of employment for an employer as a member under rules adopted by the board under W.S.

9-3-417

;

“System” means the Wyoming retirement system created by this article;

“Year of service” means a twelve (12) month period of employment with an employer as a member;

“Retirement account” means the account established under this article;

“Firefighter member” means any employee of a Wyoming national guard fire department crash and rescue unit employed on a full-time basis for firefighting and rescue operations within the department;

“Duty connected” means an illness, injury or disability from an injury or disease which results primarily from a specific act or occurrence determinable by a definite time and place, from a physical or mental trauma which arises from the nature and in the course of a person’s law enforcement employment;

“Eligible retirement plan” means:

An annuity contract described in section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code;

An eligible plan under section 457(b) of the Internal Revenue Code which is maintained by a state, political subdivision of a state, or any agency or instrumentality of a state or political subdivision of a state;

An individual retirement account or annuity described in section 408(a) or 408(b) of the Internal Revenue Code that is eligible to be rolled over and would otherwise be includible in gross income; or

A qualified plan described in section 401(a) or 403(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.

“Rollover contribution” means the transfer of funds from an eligible retirement plan, in an amount eligible to be rolled over to a qualified trust in accordance with applicable law and for which the member provides evidence satisfactory to the system that such amount qualifies for rollover treatment;

“General member initially employed after August 31, 2012” means a general member, other than a member meeting the provisions of subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, who:

Becomes an employee for whom contributions are made for service performed on or after September 1, 2012 and:

Was not previously a contributing member; or

Was previously a contributing member who withdrew his accumulated contributions and did not redeposit those contributions before September 1, 2012; or

Was previously a contributing member who left service with less than four (4) years service credit, without withdrawing his accumulated contributions, and returned to service on or after September 1, 2012.

A member who was deployed to active military or other emergency service of the United States and who was previously employed by a participating employer prior to September 1, 2012 and withdrew his accumulated contributions, shall not be deemed to be a member initially employed after August 31, 2012 due to the provisions of subdivision (A)(II) of this paragraph, if the withdrawal was in accordance with provisions of the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act, 38 U.S.C. 4301 et seq., and board rules adopted to meet the requirements of that act.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 114, § 2; 1957, ch. 202, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-295; Laws 1959, ch. 16, § 1; ch. 86, § 1; 1961, ch. 76, §§ 1, 2; ch. 92, § 1; 1965, ch. 38, § 1; ch. 82, § 1; 1971, ch. 263, § 1; 1973, ch. 158, §§ 2, 3; ch. 245, § 3; 1975, ch. 105, §§ 1, 2; 1976, ch. 25, § 1; 1977, ch. 87, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

9-5-202

,

9-3-402

; Laws 1978, ch. 11, § 1; 1979, ch. 110, § 1; 1981, ch. 33, § 1; ch. 37, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1983, ch. 26, § 1; ch. 94, § 1; ch. 149, § 1; 1987, ch. 202, § 1; 1989, ch. 167, § 1; ch. 219, § 1; 1991, ch. 188, § 1; 1992, ch. 5, § 1; ch. 15, § 1; 1994, ch. 67, §§ 2, 3; 1996, ch. 110, § 1; 1998, ch. 32, § 1; ch. 52, § 1; ch. 76, § 2; ch. 98, § 1; 2001, ch. 46, § 1; ch. 65, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 82, § 2; 2003, ch. 163, § 1; 2005, ch. 165, § 1; ch. 231, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2007, ch. 47, § 1; 2008, ch. 45, §§ 1, 2; 2010, ch. 58, § 1; 2012, ch. 108, § 1; 2015 ch. 10, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2015; 2018 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 52, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 90, § 1, effective February 26, 2019; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 109, § 2, effective April 5, 2021.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 165, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, in (a)(xviii), inserted “probation and parole agent employed by the Wyoming department of corrections.”

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 231, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, in (a)(xxiv), deleted “within the trust and agency fund” following “established.”

See the conflicting legislation note. This section is set out incorporating amendments made by both 2005 acts.

The 2006 amendment

inserted “and” in (a)(vi)(U); and made a related change.

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (a)(xxvi).

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “county memorial hospital, special hospital district” for “except county memorial hospitals or special hospital districts” in (a)(vi)(B); and repealed (a)(vii)(F)(III), which read: “County memorial hospital or special hospital district pension plans.”

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added (a)(xxvii) and (a)(xxviii).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, in (a)(xix), added subparagraph designation (a)(xix)(A), added “For members not subject to subparagraph (B) of this paragraph” in (a)(xix)(A), added (a)(xix)(B), and made a stylistic change; and added (a)(xxix).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “the actuarial assumptions determined by the board” for “a unisex mortality table based on the average of the 1971 group annuity mortality tables for males and females set back one (1) year and six and one-quarter percent (6.25%) interest per year” in (a)(iii); substituted “legislative service office” for “state legislature” in (a)(vi)(Q); repealed former (a)(vii)(D), which read: “A permanent employee of the legislature, unless the employee elects in writing to become a member under rules adopted by the board”; added (a)(viii)(N); in (a)(xii), deleted “Regular” at the beginning and inserted “or rates”; and substituted “a Wyoming national guard” for “the Wyoming air national guard” in (a)(xxv).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018,
in (a)(i), redesignated former ending text as (a)(i)(A); in (a)(i)(A),
added “For a member who has a minimum of four (4) years of
service or a member initially employed before July 1, 2018”
at the beginning; added (a)(i)(B); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(i)(A) and (B), added ", subject to subparagraph (C) of this paragraph" at the end; and added (a)(i)(C).

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 56, § 3, in (a)(vii)(M), substituted "9-2-3207(a)(xi)(F)" for "9-2-1022(a)(xi)(F)" and "9-2-3207(a)(xi)(F)(III) or (IV)" for "9-2-1022(a)(xi)(F)(III) or (IV)."

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 109, § 2, added "duly authorized personnel of the Wyoming gaming commission meeting the specifications of W.S. 7-2-101(a)(iv)(P)" in (a)(xvii).

Laws 2021, ch. 109, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 5, 2021.

Editor's notes. —

The session laws referred to in subsection (a)(xvii) were repealed in 1953.

There is no subparagraph (a)(vi)(I), (a)(vi)(L), (a)(vi)(V), (a)(vii)(I) or (a)(vii)(L) and no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2005, ch. 165, § 2, directs that coverage of probation and parole agents employed by the Wyoming department of corrections under §

9-3-432

as provided by this act are not to be implemented by the Wyoming retirement board until funds payable to the Wyoming retirement system are received for deposit into the retirement account, as necessary for maintaining the actuarial integrity of the account and funding all liability arising under this act, for years of service prior to the date of entry or expansion of coverage. Additionally, §

9-3-432

, with respect to probation and parole agents employed by the Wyoming department of corrections, is not to be implemented by the Wyoming retirement board until funds necessary for maintaining the actuarial integrity of the account and funding any liability arising under this act, are deposited into the Wyoming retirement account by the Wyoming department of corrections and contributions required under subsections (a) and (b) are paid to the Wyoming retirement system for deposit into the retirement account for at least two months of covered service following the date of entry of coverage, as applicable. Accordingly, section 3 of the act appropriates $2,496,321 from the general fund to the department of corrections to the retirement account to fund the liability arising under the act for the coverage of Wyoming probation and parole agents employed by the department of corrections as provided by the act.

Laws 2008, ch. 45, §
3, provides:

“(a) Coverage of county hospital or special hospital district employees as authorized under section 1 of this act shall not be implemented by the Wyoming retirement board until funds payable to the Wyoming retirement system are received for deposit into the retirement account, as necessary for maintaining the actuarial integrity of the account and funding all liability arising under this act, for years of service prior to the date of entry or expansion of coverage.

“(b) Prior to January 1, 2009, any county memorial hospital or special hospital district shall elect to participate in either the retirement plan offered by the institution or the Wyoming retirement system.
Each hospital shall, prior to January 1, 2009, provide written notice to the Wyoming retirement board of its election under this subsection.”

Laws 2018,
ch. 31, § 2, provides: “This act shall apply to the distribution
of benefits subject to this act made on and after the effective date
of this act.

“Nothing in
this act shall be construed to modify or impair existing contracts
or other obligations executed prior to the effective date of this
act.”

Laws 2019, ch. 52, § 2, provides: "This act shall apply to the distribution of benefits subject to this act made on and after the effective date of this act."

Internal Revenue Code. —

Section 401(a)(17) of the United States Internal Revenue Code, referred to in subsection (a)(xvi), is codified at 26 U.S.C. § 401.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Performance-based pay constituted “salary.” —

Retired teacher's performance salary was directly linked to the work plan goals set for her that she met; hence, the performance salary payments made to her constituted “salary” as that term is used in this section and should have been used to determine her retirement benefits under the Tollefson v. Wyo. State Ret. Bd. (In re Tollefson), 2003 WY 150, 79 P.3d 518,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 2003).

Severance pay not “salary.” —

Based on the plain and ordinary meanings of “severance pay” and “remuneration,” severance pay is not “renumeration” and, therefore, not “salary” and should not be included when calculating retirement benefits under §

9-3-418

. “Severance pay” is primarily gratuitous and, although it may be intended to partially alleviate the loss of employment, it is not an attempt to equally compensate the employee for services rendered, losses suffered, or expenses incurred. Mowry v. State ex rel. Wyoming Retirement Bd., 866 P.2d 729,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 195

(Wyo. 1993).

§ 9-3-403.
Wyoming retirement system; establishment; purpose; powers as body corporate.

The Wyoming retirement system is established to provide retirement and other benefits to eligible employees of participating employers. It shall be a body corporate, may sue and be sued and shall have all other powers and privileges of a corporation. In its name all its business shall be transacted, all funds invested and all of its monies, securities and other property held in trust for the purposes of this article.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 114, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-296; W.S. 1977, §§

9-5-203

,

9-3-403

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 202, § 1; 1994, ch. 67, § 2.

§ 9-3-404.
Wyoming retirement board; responsibility for administration of system; composition; appointment; term; vacancies; meetings; election of chairman.

The responsibility for the administration and operation of the retirement system is vested solely and exclusively in the Wyoming retirement board. The board shall be composed of eleven (11) members, not more than seventy-five percent (75%) of whom shall be from the same political party. The members shall be:

The state treasurer;

A retired recipient of the retirement system;

Two (2) members, exclusive of the public school system, the community colleges and the University of Wyoming, one (1) of which is a participant in the Wyoming deferred compensation program established under W.S.

9-3-501

through

9-3-508

;

Two (2) members of the public school system, the community colleges or the University of Wyoming;

Five (5) qualified electors from Wyoming who are known for their public spirit and business or professional ability, none of whom are members and at least two (2) of whom have professional expertise in investments and finance, which shall include managing asset allocation in investment portfolios.

The governor, with the consent of the Wyoming senate, shall appoint all board members other than the state treasurer. Appointed board members shall serve six (6) year terms and may be removed by the governor as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

A vacancy shall be filled as provided in W.S.

28-12-101

.

The board shall meet annually and elect a chairman from among its members. The board shall meet at such other times as the chairman directs or upon request of a majority of its members.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 114, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 9-298; Laws 1973, ch. 158, § 3; W.S. 1977, §§

9-5-204

,

9-3-404

; Laws 1979, ch. 17, § 2; 1981, ch. 42, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; ch. 202, § 1; 1994, ch. 67, § 2; 2001, ch. 64, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2016 ch. 119, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2019 ch. 106, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2006 amendment,

substituted “9-3-508” for “9-3-507” in (a)(iii).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “seventy-five percent (75%)” for “six (6)” preceding “of whom” in (a).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2001, ch. 64, § 5, provides that members appointed to the Wyoming retirement board prior to the effective date of the act (July 1, 2001) are to serve their full term and that §

9-3-404

(a)(iii) as amended by the act, which changes board member requirements, is to be implemented as soon as practicable upon expiration of the appropriate term or upon any vacancy in the appropriate membership, whichever occurs first.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 9-3-405.
Retirement board duties and powers.

In addition to any other duties prescribed by law, the board shall:

File with the legislative service office:

All system actuarial reports;

An annual audit report by an independent audit firm showing the financial status of the retirement system. The report required by this paragraph shall be submitted as part of the annual report required by W.S.

9-2-1014

;

A statement of any proposed benefit changes and the projected cost of the changes to the system.

At the request of any city, town or county not covered by the state retirement system, negotiate terms and conditions through which the city, town or county and its employees could become members of the state retirement system in accordance with the following terms and conditions:

Any city, town or county may choose to cover only its full-time employees under the retirement system;

Liabilities for any city, town or county’s employees’ service rendered prior to affiliation with the retirement system and credited by the local retirement program shall be determined according to procedures the board adopts after consultation with the system actuary;

Excluding law enforcement officers, the service rendered by any city, town or county’s employees prior to affiliation with the retirement system and which may be credited toward retirement under the retirement system shall not exceed ten (10) years and shall be the shorter of ten (10) years or the period from July 1, 1971 to the entry date of the political subdivision into the retirement system. Service rendered by any city, town or county law enforcement officer prior to affiliation with the retirement system and which may be credited toward retirement under W.S.

9-3-432

shall include all years served as a law enforcement officer with that city, town or county. Effective July 1, 2002, and ending June 30, 2008, any city, town or county may elect to have its law enforcement officers covered under W.S.

9-3-432

, if such law enforcement officers were not participating in a pension fund pursuant to W.S.

15-5-301

prior to July 1, 2002. Any such election shall be subject to the following:

The city, town or county shall contribute funds in an amount equivalent to one-half (1/2) the cost of each officer’s prior service credits with the city, town or county;

The city, town or county may require the officer to contribute the amount specified in subdivision (I) of this subparagraph as a condition of participation in the election to be covered under W.S. 9-3-432;

The state shall contribute funds in an amount equivalent to one-half (1/2) the cost of each officer’s prior service with the city, town or county.

Affiliation with the retirement system shall be effective as of July 1, following a determination of the city, town or county’s liabilities and completion of other reasonable procedures as the board directs.

Receive and act upon reports relating to the operations and funds of the system;

Ensure that the system is administered according to law;

Serve as investment trustee of the funds of the system;

Through the director employed under W.S. 9-3-406(a), administer the Wyoming deferred compensation program established under W.S.

9-3-501

through

9-3-508

;

In collaboration with participating employers, provide information, through a variety of methods including a mandatory education program, to all employees who are members as of July 1, 2012, and to all members initially enrolling after July 1, 2012. The information and program shall review retirement benefits, costs expected to be incurred in retirement and income amounts anticipated to be necessary to maintain the member’s preretirement standard of living. The information and program shall:

Emphasize that benefits provided under the plans administered by the Wyoming retirement board should not be expected to provide one hundred percent (100%) of the member’s required income in retirement;

Advise that no future cost-of-living increases or other benefit increases are incorporated into the plans as constructed;

Contain citation to and the language of W.S.

9-3-428

providing that nothing in Wyoming statutes title 9, chapter 3, article 4, shall be construed to acknowledge any past, present or future liability of or obligate the state of Wyoming for contribution except the employer’s contributions provided for in that article, to either the Wyoming retirement system provided by that article or any other retirement system previously existing in the state of Wyoming.

The board may establish special pay plans that upon retirement or separation from service, entitle an employee of the state to a contribution to a qualified retirement plan established in the employee’s name. Special pay plans established under this paragraph shall be in compliance with section 401(a) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, which reduce the federal tax burden on accumulated vacation, sick or other accumulated leave payments to employees upon retirement or separation from service. In the event an employee elects to withdraw his contribution to the special pay plan prior to reaching age fifty-five (55), the state shall reimburse the employee the difference between any Federal Insurance Contributions Act (FICA) and any Medicare tax savings to the employee and any early withdrawal penalty imposed by the Internal Revenue Service.

For purposes of preparation of the administration and operational budget of the board, the board shall operate on a fiscal year commencing on July 1. The board may operate the state retirement account and any other retirement account under its management upon a calendar year basis or a fiscal year basis as the board determines appropriate.

For purpose of calculating member accounts, the board may establish reporting requirements for any retirement plan, program and system administered by the board to determine the amount or percentage of the employee or member contribution that is paid by a reduction in cash salary of the employee or member.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 158, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-298.1; W.S. 1977, §§

9-5-205

,

9-3-405

; Laws 1981, ch. 35, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 202, § 1; 1994, ch. 67, § 2; 1997, ch. 31, § 2; 2001, ch. 64, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 82, § 2; 2003, ch. 96, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2007, ch. 14, § 1; 2009, ch. 90, § 2; 2012, ch. 107, § 2; 2018 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2006 amendment

substituted “9-3-508” for “9-3-507” in (a)(vi).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in the introductory language in (a)(ii)(C), inserted “and ending June 30, 2008,” in the second sentence, added “Any such election” at the beginning of the third sentence, and made stylistic and related changes.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (c).

The 2012 amendment,

added (a)(vii).

Laws 2012, ch. 107, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2012.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added (d).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2001, ch. 64, § 6 transfers the management and control of all accounts comprising and pertaining to the Wyoming deferred compensation program, including all monies within these accounts and an accounting of such monies, to the Wyoming retirement board.

Laws 2009, ch. 90, § 4 provides: “It is the intent of this act to impose a fiscal year of July 1 through June 30 on all governmental entities in this state, including all agencies, boards, commissions, institutions, instrumentalities, political subdivisions and special districts, no matter how formed, unless specifically exempted or otherwise authorized by law.
The intent of this act is to repeal any noncodified provision which conflicts with the provisions of this act, including but not limited to earlier adopted government reorganization acts.
Any entity required to change its current fiscal year of operation may elect to extend its current fiscal year or shorten its current fiscal year and commence its next fiscal year on July 1, 2009 or July 1, 2010, as it finds most convenient and efficient for its circumstances.”

Laws 2018,
ch. 31, § 2, provides: “This act shall apply to the distribution
of benefits subject to this act made on and after the effective date
of this act.

“Nothing in
this act shall be construed to modify or impair existing contracts
or other obligations executed prior to the effective date of this
act.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”